Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.390.
Speed — Secretary authorized to increase speed limit in certain areas by official order — Parking.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Business district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway if, within six hundred (600) feet along the highway, there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes that occupy three hundred (300) feet of frontage on one (1) side or three hundred (300) feet collectively on both sides of the highway;

“Residential district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district if the property on the highway for a distance of three hundred (300) feet or more is improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business; and

“State highway” means a highway or street maintained by the Kentucky Department of Highways.

An operator of a vehicle upon a highway shall not drive at a greater speed than is reasonable and prudent, having regard for the traffic and for the condition and use of the highway.

The speed limit for motor vehicles on state highways shall be as follows, unless conditions exist that require lower speed for compliance with subsection (2) of this section, or the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet establishes a different speed limit in accordance with subsection (4) of this section:

Sixty-five (65) miles per hour on interstate highways and parkways;

Fifty-five (55) miles per hour on all other state highways; and

Thirty-five (35) miles per hour in a business or residential district.

If the secretary of transportation determines, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, that any speed limit is greater or less than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at any intersection, or upon any part of a state highway, the secretary of transportation may establish by official order a reasonable and safe speed limit at the location. The secretary shall not increase any speed limit established by subsection (3) of this section in excess of sixty-five (65) miles per hour, except that, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section, the secretary may increase the speed limit on any of the following segments of highway to seventy (70) miles per hour:

Interstate 24 (entire length);

Interstate 64 from Interstate 264 to the West Virginia state line;

Interstate 65 from Interstate 264 to the Tennessee state line;

Interstate 69 (entire length);

Interstate 71 from Interstate 264 to Interstate 275;

Interstate 75 from the Tennessee state line to Interstate 275;

Interstate 165 (entire length);

The Audubon Parkway (entire length);

The Julian M. Carroll Purchase Parkway (entire length);

The Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway (entire length);

The Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway Extension (entire length);

The Edward T. Breathitt Pennyrile Parkway (entire length);

The Wendell H. Ford Western Kentucky Parkway (entire length);

The Louie B. Nunn Cumberland Expressway (entire length);

The Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway (entire length); and

The William H. Natcher Parkway (entire length).

In a highway work zone, the Transportation Cabinet may temporarily reduce established speed limits without an engineering or traffic investigation. A speed limit established under this paragraph shall become effective when and where posted. The Transportation Cabinet shall post signs notifying the traveling public of the temporary highway work zone maximum speed limit. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent the Transportation Cabinet from using moveable or portable speed limit signs in highway work zones.

A city or a county may by ordinance establish speed limits within its own jurisdiction, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The alteration of speed limits on state highways within a city or a county shall not be effective until the alteration has been approved by the secretary of transportation. The secretary shall not approve any alteration that could increase any speed limit established by subsection (3)(b) or (c) of this section in excess of fifty-five (55) miles per hour.

If a county determines, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation and study, that it is unsafe to park motor vehicles on or along any highway, other than a state highway, within the unincorporated areas of the county, or that in any business district the congestion of traffic justifies a reasonable limitation on the length of time any one (1) motor vehicle is permitted to park in such district so as to reduce the congestion, the fiscal court may by ordinance establish “no parking” areas on the highway, or limit the length of time any motor vehicle may be parked in any business district.

The speed limit for motor vehicles in an off-street parking facility offered for public use, whether publicly or privately owned, shall be fifteen (15) miles per hour.

Except as outlined in KRS

189.940

, a person shall not drive a motor vehicle at a speed that will impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, except when reduced speed is necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law.

In every charge for a violation of any speed limit specified in this section, the warrant or citation shall specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven, and the lawful speed limit applicable at the location where the violation is charged to have occurred.

History.

2739g-43, 2739g-51, 2739g-86: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 97, § 1; 1954, ch. 143, § 1; 1962, ch. 150; 1964, ch. 13, § 1; 1966, ch. 18, § 4; 1970, ch. 93, § 10; 1974, ch. 46, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(10); 1978, ch. 230, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 177, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 37, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 43, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 168, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 186, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This section was also amended in the reviser’s bill, Acts 1978, ch. 384, sec. 336, however, Acts 1978, ch. 230, HB 211, sec. 1 prevailed. See KRS 7.136(3).

189.391.
Reduction of speed limits. [Repealed.]

189.392.
Emergency vehicles excepted.

KRS

189.390

shall not apply to emergency vehicles while being operated under the provisions of KRS

189.910

to

189.950

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 9, § 2, effective March 1, 1974; 1988, ch. 177, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

189.393.
Complying with traffic officer’s signal.

No operator of a vehicle, after having received a visual or audible signal from an officer directing traffic shall knowingly or wantonly disregard the signal so as to interfere with or endanger the operation of the traffic officer or other vehicles or pedestrians.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 128, § 1; 1998, ch. 606, § 160, effective July 15, 1998.

189.394.
Fines for speeding — Doubling of fines in school areas with flashing lights.

The fines for speeding in violation of KRS

189.390

shall be:

For speeding in excess of the speeds shown on the specific fine schedule the fine shall be not less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

For any violation shown on the chart for which a specific fine is prescribed, the defendant may elect to pay the fine and court costs to the circuit clerk before the date of his trial or to be tried in the normal manner. Payment of the fine and court costs to the clerk shall be considered as a plea of guilty for all purposes.

If the offense charged shows a speed in excess of the speeds shown on the specific fine schedule the defendant shall appear for trial and may not pay the fine to the clerk before the trial date.

If the offense occurred in an area near a school where flasher lights have been installed and are flashing, and a speed limit has been set pursuant to KRS

189.336

, the fine established by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be doubled.

Mph. Prima Facie or Maximum Speed Over Limit 15 20 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 Fine
1 16 21 26 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 $1
2 17 22 27 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 2
3 18 23 28 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 3
4 19 24 29 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 4
5 20 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 5
6 21 26 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 76 16
7 22 27 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 77 17
8 23 28 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 78 18
9 24 29 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 79 19 10 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 20 11 26 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 76 81 22 12 27 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 77 82 24 13 28 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 78 83 26 14 29 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 79 84 28 15 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 85 30 16 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 76 81 32 17 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 77 82 34 18 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 78 83 36 19 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 79 84 38 20 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 85 40 21 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 43 22 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 46 23 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 49 24 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 52 25 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 55

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 1, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 101, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 4, effective July 1, 1979; 1988, ch. 177, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 403, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 37, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 124, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 183, § 17, effective August 1, 2002; 2004, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 59, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2019 ch. 40, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

189.395.
Speed on turnpikes and limited access highways. [Repealed.]

189.396.
Enforcement of traffic regulations on off-street parking facilities offered for public use.

All law enforcement officials shall enforce the traffic regulations contained in KRS Chapter 189 on off-street parking facilities offered for public use, except for-hire parking facilities listed in KRS

189.700

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 46, § 3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The clear legislative intent of KRS

189.010

,

189.390

, and this section that peace officers shall enforce traffic laws in off-street parking facilities, including a speed limit of fifteen miles an hour, seems a reasonable exercise in the authority of the legislature to enact a law for the public good and until the sections are invalidated by a decision of the highest court of the state, all peace officers are legally obligated to enforce said sections.

OAG 75-115

.

189.400.
Turning around on curve or grade.

No vehicle shall be turned around upon any curve, or upon the approach to, or near the crest of a grade, unless it can be seen for a distance of five hundred (500) feet by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction.

History.

2739g-69n.

189.410.
Approaching curve or obstruction. [Repealed.]

189.420.
Driving on mountain highways.

The operator of a motor vehicle traveling through defiles or on mountain highways shall hold his motor vehicle under control and keep as near the right-hand edge of the highway as reasonably possible. Upon approaching any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of two hundred feet (200´) along the highway, he shall give audible warning with the horn of his motor vehicle.

History.

2739g-69h.

189.430.
Coasting prohibited — Unattended vehicle.

The driver of a motor vehicle when traveling upon a down grade shall not coast with the gears of the vehicle in neutral.

The driver of a commercial motor vehicle when traveling upon a down grade shall not coast with the clutch disengaged.

No person operating or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition and removing the key, nor allow it to stand upon any perceptible grade without effectively setting the brake and turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway.

History.

2739g-69i.

189.440.
Starting a parked vehicle.

No person shall start a vehicle that is stopped or parked unless and until the movement can be made with reasonable safety.

History.

2739g-69o.

189.450.
Stopping, standing, parking, or repairing vehicle on roadway or shoulders of highway.

No person shall stop a vehicle, leave it standing, or cause it to stop or to be left standing upon any portion of the roadway; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to prevent parking in front of a private residence off the roadway or street in a city or suburban area where such parking is otherwise permitted, as long as the vehicle so parked does not impede the flow of traffic. This subsection shall not apply to:

A vehicle that has been disabled on the right-of-way of such a highway in such a manner and to such extent that it is impossible to avoid the occupation of the shoulder of a state-maintained highway or impracticable to remove it from the shoulder of the highway until repairs have been made or sufficient help obtained for its removal. In no event shall a disabled vehicle remain on the shoulder of a state-maintained highway for twenty-four (24) hours or more;

Motor vehicles when required to stop in obedience to the provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or any traffic ordinance, regulation, or sign or the command of any peace officer;

Vehicles operating as common carriers of passengers for hire and school buses taking passengers on such vehicle or discharging passengers therefrom; provided, that no such vehicle shall stop for such purposes at a place on the highway which does not afford reasonable visibility to approaching motor vehicles from both directions;

Vehicles which are stopped for a period of not more than fifteen (15) minutes at a time for the purpose of collecting and transporting solid waste as defined in KRS

224.1-010

(30) (a), and which are operated by a:

Collection service registered in accordance with KRS

224.43-315

; or

Person or organization actively participating in the Adopt-a-Highway Program; or

Any vehicle required to stop by reason of an obstruction to its progress.

When any police officer finds a vehicle standing upon such a highway in violation of this section, he may move or cause to be moved the vehicle or require the operator or other person in charge of the vehicle to move it. The police officer may cause the vehicle to be removed by ordering any person engaged in the business of storing or towing motor vehicles to remove the vehicle to a site chosen by such person. Ownership of the vehicle shall be determined by the police officer’s enforcement agency through the vehicle’s license plates, serial number, or other means of determining ownership. As soon as practicable, the police officer’s enforcement agency shall notify the owner by mail that the vehicle was illegally upon public property; the name and address of the storage facility where the vehicle is located; that removal of the vehicle from the storage facility will involve payment of towing and storage charges; and that the vehicle may be sold pursuant to the provisions of KRS

376.275

if not claimed within sixty (60) days. No notification shall be required if ownership cannot be determined. In the event of a sale pursuant to KRS

376.275

, the state shall receive any proceeds after the satisfaction of all liens placed on the vehicle.

No vehicle shall be parked, stopped, or allowed to stand on the shoulders of any toll road, interstate highway, or other fully controlled access highway, including ramps thereto, nor shall any vehicle registered at a gross weight of over forty-four thousand (44,000) pounds be parked, stopped, or allowed to stand on the shoulders of any state-maintained highway, except that, in the case of emergency or in response to a peace officer’s signal, vehicles shall be permitted to stop on the shoulders to the right of the traveled way with all wheels and projecting parts of the vehicles, including the load, completely clear of the traveled way. Parking of any vehicle which is disabled on the shoulders of a toll road, interstate highway, other fully controlled access highway, including ramps thereto, or any state-maintained highway not mentioned in this section for twenty-four (24) hours continuously is prohibited and vehicles violating this provision may be towed away at the cost of the owner.

When any police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon any bridge or causeway or in a tunnel where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic, the officer may provide for the removal of the vehicle to the nearest garage or other place of safety as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

No person shall stop or park a vehicle except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic control device, in the following places:

On a sidewalk;

In front of sidewalk ramps provided for persons with disabilities;

In front of a public or private driveway;

Within an intersection or on a crosswalk;

At any place where official signs prohibit stopping or parking;

Within thirty (30) feet upon the approach to any flashing beacon, stop sign, or traffic control signal located at the side of a roadway;

On any controlled access highway;

Within a highway tunnel;

Within fifteen (15) feet of a fire hydrant; or

In an area between the roadways of a divided highway.

No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under his control into any such prohibited area.

The restrictions in subsection (5)(e) of this section shall not apply to sheriffs and their deputies or police officers when operating properly identified vehicles during performance of their official duties.

HISTORY:

2739g-48: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 206, § 3; 1954, ch. 235; 1962, ch. 288, § 2; 1964, ch. 25, § 1; 1970, ch. 93, § 11; 1974, ch. 405, § 1; 1980, ch. 163, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 318, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 322, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 405, § 39, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 173, § 19, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 117, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

189.455.
Parking privileges for handicapped — Special registration plates — Issuance — Violations. [Repealed.]

189.456.
Accessible parking placard for person with a disability — Duplicate placard — Fees — Proof of disability — Application by parent or guardian — Organizations transporting disabled individuals — Display — Administrative regulations.

On the application of any person who has a severe visual, audio, or physical impairment, including partial paralysis, lower limb amputation, chronic heart condition, emphysema, arthritis, rheumatism, or other debilitating condition which limits or impairs one’s personal mobility or ability to walk, the county clerk in the county of the person’s residence shall issue the person with a disability an accessible parking placard. In addition, any agency or organization which transports persons with a disability as a part of the service provided by that agency or organization shall receive an accessible parking placard upon application to the county clerk for each vehicle used in the transportation of persons with a disability. The accessible parking placard issued shall be a two (2) sided hanger style placard and shall on each side bear the international symbol of access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969. One (1) side of the placard shall bear the date of expiration of the placard, a seal or other identification of the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet, and shall contain the accessible parking placard identification number and other information the Transportation Cabinet may by regulation require. The international symbol of access shall be at least three (3) inches in height, be centered on the placard and in a white color on a blue shield. Any information contained on the placard shall be written in indelible ink or inscribed in other permanent fashion so as to prevent tampering with or the changing of information contained on the placard.

The county clerk shall issue an applicant one (1) accessible parking placard at no cost. Except as outlined in subsection (7) of this section, an applicant may obtain one (1) duplicate placard. A fee of ten dollars ($10) shall be assessed for an initial or renewal duplicate placard, of which eight dollars ($8) shall be forwarded to the road fund and two dollars ($2) shall be retained by the clerk. The placard shall be valid for a period of six (6) years and may be renewed an unlimited number of times. A placard shall expire in the applicant’s birth month and may be renewed up to twelve (12) months prior to its expiration date. Upon renewal, a receipt and decal shall be issued that both contain the placard number, placard expiration date, and other information required by the Transportation Cabinet. The decal shall be affixed to the existing placard. Placards shall be printed at cabinet expense. The county clerk of each county shall keep a record of applications filed and placards issued. Placards issued under this section shall be issued in the name of the applicant and shall not be tied to the applicant’s motor vehicle or a motor vehicle used to transport the applicant.

For every person seeking an initial accessible parking placard or renewal of a placard issued prior to July 14, 2018, proof of the disability shall be required by:

Evidence that the individual has a license plate for a person with a disability as provided by KRS

186.041

or

186.042

;

The county clerk issuing the permit ascertaining that the applicant meets the criteria established by the Transportation Cabinet for determining that the applicant is disabled; or

A statement from a licensed physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or advanced practice registered nurse that the applicant is a person whose mobility, flexibility, coordination, respiration, or perceptiveness is significantly reduced by a permanent disability to that person’s arms, legs, lungs, heart, ears, or eyes. The statement shall be on a form prescribed by the Transportation Cabinet and shall not be dated more than sixty (60) days prior to the date of application.

A parent or guardian of a disabled minor may apply for a placard on behalf of the disabled person by submitting the form identified in subsection (3) of this section.

A parent or guardian of a disabled adult may apply for a placard on behalf of the disabled person by submitting the form identified in subsection (3) of this section and a power of attorney or proof of guardianship for the disabled person.

The Transportation Cabinet may allow the county clerk to issue an accessible disabled placard to an organization transporting disabled individuals. For every agency or organization seeking an accessible parking placard for a person with a disability, application for the placard shall include:

Name of the agency or organization requesting use of an accessible parking placard;

Number of vehicles being used in the transportation of persons with a disability; and

A statement from the director of the agency or organization verifying the need for the parking placard.

The accessible parking placard shall, when the vehicle is parked in a parking space identified as accessible to a person with a disability, be displayed so that the expiration date may be viewed from the front of the vehicle by hanging the placard from the front windshield rear view mirror. When there is no rear view mirror, the placard shall be displayed on the dashboard so that the expiration date may be viewed.

A person who has been issued a license plate for a person with a disability under the provisions of KRS

186.041

or

186.042

shall only be issued one (1) parking placard under this section at no cost and shall not be issued a duplicate placard.

A person with a disability who has been issued a parking placard pursuant to this section may make application for a replacement placard by swearing in an affidavit that the original placard has been lost, stolen, or destroyed. The replacement parking placard shall be issued at a fee of ten dollars ($10), of which eight dollars ($8) shall be forwarded to the road fund and two dollars ($2) shall be retained by the clerk. If a damaged placard is returned to the clerk, a replacement shall be issued at no cost.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement or administer this section, including but not limited to the designing of required forms, establishing placard issuance criteria for county clerks, and establishing criteria for placard issuance for organizations.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 305, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 359, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 60, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 40, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2004, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 255, § 4, effective January 1, 2007; 2008, ch. 33, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 405 and 416. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 416, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Neither KRS

186.041

nor this section requires a city to provide specific handicapped parking facilities though there appears to be an implication to this effect under former subsection (6) of this section which authorizes handicapped persons qualifying to park in a designated handicapped parking place even when a parking limit is imposed by allowing such vehicle to be parked for a period of two hours in excess of the legal parking period prescribed by the local authorities with certain exceptions mentioned therein. There is nothing under either statute prohibiting the charging of parking fees for handicapped parking spaces, the same as would be required for parking generally.

OAG 82-116

.

A doctor of chiropractic is not considered a “licensed physician” for the purpose of certifying the disability of an applicant for a handicapped parking permit; only a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy duly licensed pursuant to KRS Ch. 311 is competent to certify the existence of a handicap pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section.

OAG 82-130

.

A deaf mute cannot be considered handicapped within those statutes permitting special parking spaces and permits for persons having handicaps.

OAG 84-110

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Special registration plates and parking privileges for handicapped, KRS

186.042

.

189.458.
Temporary accessible parking placard for person with a disability — Replacement — Fee — Proof of disability — Display — Administrative regulations.

Upon application of any person who has a severe temporary visual, audio, or physical impairment, including partial paralysis, heart condition, emphysema, arthritis, rheumatism, or other debilitating condition which limits or impairs one’s personal mobility or ability to walk as defined in KRS

186.042

, the county clerk in the county of the person’s residence shall issue the person with a disability a temporary accessible parking placard.

The accessible parking placard issued shall be a two (2) sided hanger style placard and shall on each side bear the international symbol of access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969. One (1) side of the placard shall bear the date of expiration of the placard, a seal or other identification of the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet, and shall contain the accessible parking placard identification number and other information the Transportation Cabinet may by administrative regulation require. The international symbol of access shall be at least three (3) inches in height, be centered on the placard and in a white color on a red shield.

A temporary accessible parking placard shall be issued at no charge by the county clerk, and the placard shall be valid for a period of not more than three (3) months.

A person with a disability who has been issued a temporary parking placard pursuant to this section may make application for a replacement placard by swearing in an affidavit that the original placard has been lost, stolen, or destroyed. A replacement parking placard shall be issued at a fee of ten dollars ($10), of which eight dollars ($8) shall be forwarded to the road fund and two dollars ($2) shall be retained by the clerk. Replacement placards issued under this paragraph shall retain the same expiration date as the initial temporary placard. If a damaged placard is returned to the clerk, a replacement shall be issued at no cost.

The application shall be made on a form prepared by the Transportation Cabinet. The placards shall be printed at cabinet expense. The county clerk of each county shall keep a record of applications filed and placards issued. Placards issued under this section shall be issued in the name of the applicant and shall not be tied to the applicant’s motor vehicle or a motor vehicle used to transport the applicant.

For every person seeking a temporary accessible parking placard, proof of the disability shall be required by:

The county clerk ascertaining that the applicant meets the criteria established by the Transportation Cabinet for placard issuance; or

A statement from a licensed physician, physician assistant, physical therapist, occupational therapist, chiropractor, or advanced practice registered nurse that the applicant is a person whose mobility, flexibility, coordination, respiration, or perceptiveness is significantly reduced by a temporary disability to that person’s arms, legs, lungs, heart, ears, or eyes. The statement shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the cabinet and shall not be dated more than sixty (60) days prior to the date of application.

The temporary accessible parking placard, when the vehicle is parked in a parking space designated as accessible to and for the use of a person with a disability, shall be displayed so that the expiration date may be viewed from the front of the vehicle by hanging it from the front windshield rear view mirror. When there is no rear view mirror, the placard shall be displayed on the dashboard so that the expiration date may be viewed.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement or administer this section, including but not limited to the designing of required forms and establishing placard issuance criteria for county clerks.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 60, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 41, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2004, ch. 131, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 255, § 5, effective January 1, 2007; 2014, ch. 76, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

189.459.
Parking limits for vehicles with plates or placards for persons with a disability — Prohibitions.

When a motor vehicle which is being operated by or for the benefit of the person with a disability who is in the motor vehicle at the time it is being operated is displaying an auto registration plate as provided in KRS

186.041

or

186.042

or

186.0425

, an out-of-state or out-of-country registration plate for a person with a disability bearing the international symbol of access, a parking placard issued by any United States Department of Veterans Affairs hospital, or an accessible parking placard issued to a person with a disability as prescribed in KRS

189.456

or

189.458

or by another state or foreign country when the accessible parking placard meets the basic requirements of KRS

189.456

or

189.458

, the vehicle may be parked in a parking place designated as accessible to and for the use of a person with a disability.

When parked where a parking limit is imposed, the vehicle may be parked for a period of two (2) hours in excess of the legal parking period permitted by local authorities, except where local ordinances or police regulations prohibit parking on a highway for the purpose of creating a fire lane or where the ordinances or police regulations provide for the accommodation of heavy traffic during morning, afternoon, or evening hours or where the motor vehicle is parked in such a manner as to clearly be a traffic hazard. No person shall park in a parking area designated as accessible to and for the use of a person with a disability in a motor vehicle not displaying either an auto registration plate as provided in KRS

186.041

,

186.042

,

186.0425

, or an out-of-state registration plate designated for the use of a person with a disability on the rear of the vehicle unless he displays on the dashboard of his motor vehicle an accessible parking placard issued to a person with a disability. No person shall park a vehicle displaying an accessible parking placard in a parking area designated as accessible to and for the use of a person with a disability when the person with a disability is not in the motor vehicle.

No person shall make, issue, possess, or knowingly use any imitation, counterfeit, or transferable placard or license plate for a person with a disability.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 60, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 405, § 42, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 42, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 405 and 416. Where these Acts are not in conflict they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 416, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

189.4595.
Exemption from local motor vehicle licenses and fees for disabled veterans or Congressional Medal of Honor, Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross recipients — Extension of legal parking period.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, a city, county, town, or other political subdivision of this state shall not require any license or fee from a disabled veteran, recipient of the Congressional Medal of Honor, or recipient of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross who has been issued a special military-related license plate under KRS

186.041

, for the privilege of operating a motor vehicle upon any street or alley.

When a motor vehicle bearing a special military-related license plate for disabled veterans, recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor, or recipients of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross is being operated by or for the benefit of the person, the motor vehicle may be parked for a period of two (2) hours in excess of the legal parking period permitted by local authorities unless a local ordinance or police regulation:

Prohibits parking on a highway for the purpose of creating a fire lane:

Provides for the accommodation of heavy traffic during morning, afternoon, or evening hours; or

Prohibits parking a motor vehicle in a manner as to clearly be a traffic hazard.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 453, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 45, § 2, effective June 21, 2001.

189.460.
Following or obstructing fire apparatus prohibited. [Repealed.]

189.470.
Obstruction to operator’s view or control.

No person shall operate a vehicle when it is so loaded, or when there are in the front seat such number of persons, exceeding three (3), as to obstruct the view of the operator to the front or sides of the vehicle or as to interfere with the operator’s control over the vehicle.

No passenger in a vehicle or street car shall ride in such a position as to interfere with the operator’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with his control over the vehicle or street car.

History.

2739g-69g.

189.480.
Towed vehicles.

No vehicle shall haul with a towline more than one (1) other vehicle. The towline shall not be over fifteen (15) feet in length, and a white cloth or flag shall be fastened to the towline at or near the center of the line, during both day and night so as to make it plainly discernible. No vehicle shall at one (1) time haul more than two (2) vehicles connected in such a manner as to keep them uniformly spaced. Any vehicle being towed under the provisions of this chapter shall have the brake lights required under KRS

189.050

.

History.

2739g-29, 2739g-30; 2006, ch. 173, § 20, effective July 12, 2006.

Opinions of Attorney General.

So long as the vehicles are evenly or uniformly spaced, it would be permissible to haul or tow as many as two, but no more, by the driveaway method.

OAG 63-246

.

This section does not forbid a triple saddlemount driveaway operation.

OAG 70-547

.

This section has no application as to towing vehicles by the saddle-mount method and applies only to two types of towing: (1) the tow line method, and (2) the tow bar method which provides for a tow uniformly spaced.

OAG 80-528

.

189.490.
Trailer operation restricted. [Repealed.]

189.500.
Logs or stones not to be dragged on highways.

No person shall draw upon a highway any logs or stones with the ends dragged on the ground, so as to injure the highway.

History.

4345.

189.505.
Motor vehicle races on highways prohibited.

No person shall engage upon any street or highway in motor vehicle racing, drag racing, or any other form of competition involving motor vehicles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 19, 1958.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The term “highway” does not include a newly constructed road before it is open to the public.

OAG 67-455

.

189.510.
Horse race on highway prohibited.

No person shall ride a horse, nor shall the owner of a horse consent to the racing of his horse, in a horse race on a highway.

History.

4348.